California statutes. Public Resources Code
(b) Of the moneys appropriated in subdivision (a), up to five hundred fifty thousand dollars ($550,000) may be expended by the authority for the initial administrative costs in implementing this chapter.

(c) All repayments of moneys disbursed pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited into the Renewable Resource Trust Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 677, Sec. 33.   (SB 1128)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

26082.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 26080, twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) of the unencumbered balance of the fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) that was appropriated to the authority pursuant to Section 26080 and is in the Renewable Resource Trust Fund is hereby appropriated to the Energy Conservation Assistance Account established pursuant to Section 25416.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 25421, any unexpended funds appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a) remaining in the Energy Conservation Assistance Account on and after January 1, 2013, except to the extent those funds are encumbered pursuant to Section 25417.5,
 shall revert to the Renewable Resource Trust Fund and be available to the authority for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 677, Sec. 33.   (SB 1128)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 16.3. CLEAN ENERGY JOB CREATION [26200. - 26240.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [26200. - 26201.]

26200.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the California Clean Energy Jobs Act.

(History: Added November 6, 2012, by initiative Proposition 39, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

26201.

This division has the following objectives:

(a) Create good-paying energy efficiency and clean energy jobs in California.

(b) Put Californians to work repairing and updating schools and public buildings to improve their energy efficiency and make other clean energy improvements that create jobs and save energy and money.

(c) Promote the creation of new private sector jobs improving the energy efficiency of commercial and residential buildings.

(d) Achieve the maximum amount of job creation and energy benefits with available funds.

(e) Supplement, complement, and leverage existing energy efficiency and clean energy programs to create increased economic and energy benefits for California in coordination with the California Energy Commission and the California Public Utilities Commission.

(f) Provide a full public accounting of all money spent and jobs and benefits achieved so the programs and projects funded pursuant to this division can be reviewed and evaluated.

(History: Added November 6, 2012, by initiative Proposition 39, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Clean Energy Job Creation Fund [26205. - 26208.]

26205.

The Clean Energy Job Creation Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. Except as provided in Section 26208, the sum of five hundred fifty million dollars ($550,000,000) shall be transferred from the General Fund to the Job Creation Fund in fiscal years 2013–14, 2014–15, 2015–16, 2016–17, and 2017–18. Moneys in the fund shall be available for appropriation for the purpose of funding projects that create jobs in California improving energy efficiency and expanding clean energy generation, including all of the following:

(a) Schools and public facilities:

(1) Public schools: Energy efficiency retrofits and clean energy installations, along with related improvements and repairs that contribute to
 reduced operating costs and improved health and safety conditions, on public schools.

(2) Universities and colleges: Energy efficiency retrofits, clean energy installations, and other energy system improvements to reduce costs and achieve energy and environmental benefits.

(3) Other public buildings and facilities: Financial and technical assistance including revolving loan funds, reduced interest loans, or other financial assistance for cost-effective energy efficiency retrofits and clean energy installations on public facilities.

(b) Job training and workforce development: Funding to the California Conservation Corps, Certified Community Conservation Corps, YouthBuild, and other existing workforce development programs to train and employ disadvantaged youth, veterans, and others on energy efficiency and clean
 energy projects.

(c) Public-private partnerships: Assistance to local governments in establishing and implementing Property Assessed Clean Energy (PACE) programs or similar financial and technical assistance for cost-effective retrofits that include repayment requirements. Funding shall be prioritized to maximize job creation, energy savings, and geographical and economic equity. Where feasible, repayment revenues shall be used to create revolving loan funds or similar ongoing financial assistance programs to continue job creation benefits.

(History: Added November 6, 2012, by initiative Proposition 39, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

26205.5.

(a) Of the moneys provided to the Job Creation Fund for purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 26205, the available remaining funds, which are the funds allocated to a local educational agency that has not submitted an energy expenditure plan, as determined by the Energy Commission as of March 1, 2018, shall be appropriated as follows:

(1) The first seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) shall be provided to school districts, county offices of education, and joint power authorities currently operating home-to-school transportation programs on behalf of local educational agencies for grants or loans for schoolbus retrofit or replacement through a program administered by the Energy Commission, in consultation with the State Air Resources Board.

(A) Priority shall be given to school districts, county offices of education, and joint power authorities currently operating home-to-school transportation programs on behalf of local educational agencies operating the oldest schoolbuses or schoolbuses operating in disadvantaged communities, as identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code, as determined by the State Air Resources Board, and to school districts, county offices of education, or joint power authorities currently operating home-to-school transportation programs on behalf of local educational agencies with a majority of students eligible for free or reduced-price meals in the prior year.

(B) Any schoolbuses that have been replaced pursuant to this paragraph shall be scrapped.

(C) A local air district may administer funding provided pursuant to this paragraph, if authorized by the Energy Commission.

(2) The next one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) shall be deposited into the Education Subaccount, created pursuant to Section 26227, for the purpose of low-interest and no-interest revolving loans and loan
 loss reserves for eligible projects and technical assistance on a competitive basis. Priority shall be given to local educational agencies based on the percentage of students eligible for free or reduced-price meals in the prior year, energy savings, geographic diversity, and diversity in the size of the local educational agencies’ student populations. If a local educational agency has a project eligible for a loan under this paragraph, the maximum loan amount for the project shall be the project cost reduced by both of the following, as applicable:

(A) The amount of any grant awarded for the project pursuant to paragraph (3).

(B) Any state, federal, or local incentives that have been provided for the project.

(3) (A) (i) The remaining moneys, if any, shall be provided to
 local educational agencies in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 26227.2, as implemented by the Energy Commission, in consultation with the State Department of Education, as follows:

(I) Ten percent shall be for local educational agencies with an average daily attendance of not more than 1,000.

(II) Ten percent shall be for local educational agencies with an average daily attendance of more than 1,000 and not more than 2,000.

(III) Eighty percent shall be for local educational agencies with an average daily attendance of more than 2,000.

(ii) The Energy Commission may adjust the funding allocations specified in clause (i) and may add additional categories based on average daily attendance to further the purposes of Section 26227.2.

(B) The Energy Commission shall facilitate local educational agency pursuit of funding under this paragraph and from the State Energy Conservation Assistance Account through coordinated information, documentation, and review processes regarding the project.

(C) For purposes of this paragraph, average daily attendance shall be those numbers as reported in the prior year, as determined by the State Department of Education.

(b) A local educational agency that receives moneys pursuant to this section shall encumber those moneys within nine months of allocation.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Energy Commission” means the State Energy Resources Conservation
 and Development Commission.

(2) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, charter school, or state special school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 32, Sec. 127.   (AB 1808)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

26206.

The following criteria apply to all expenditures from the Job Creation Fund:

(a) Project selection and oversight shall be managed by existing state and local government agencies with expertise in managing energy projects and programs.

(b) All projects shall be selected based on in-state job creation and energy benefits for each project type.

(c) All projects shall be cost effective: total benefits shall be greater than project costs over time. Project selection may include consideration of non-energy benefits, such as health and safety, in addition to energy benefits.

(d) All projects shall require contracts that identify the project specifications, costs, and projected energy savings.

(e) All projects shall be subject to audit.

(f) Program overhead costs shall not exceed 4 percent of total funding.

(g) Funds shall be appropriated only to agencies with established expertise in managing energy projects and programs.

(h) All programs shall be coordinated with the California Energy Commission and the California Public Utilities Commission to avoid duplication and maximize leverage of existing energy efficiency and clean energy efforts.

(i) Eligible expenditures include costs associated with technical assistance, and with reducing project costs
 and delays, such as development and implementation of processes that reduce the costs of design, permitting or financing, or other barriers to project completion and job creation.

(History: Added November 6, 2012, by initiative Proposition 39, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

26208.

If the Department of Finance and the Legislative Analyst jointly determine that the estimated annual increase in revenues as a result of the amendment, addition, or repeal of Sections 25128, 25128.5, 25128.7, and 25136 of the Revenue and Taxation Code is less than one billion one hundred million dollars ($1,100,000,000), the amount transferred to the Job Creation Fund shall be decreased to an amount equal to one-half of the estimated annual increase in revenues.

(History: Added November 6, 2012, by initiative Proposition 39, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Accountability, Independent Audits, Public Disclosure [26210. - 26217.]

26210.

(a) The Citizens Oversight Board is hereby created.

(b) The board shall be composed of nine members: three members shall be appointed by the Treasurer, three members by the Controller, and three members by the Attorney General. Each appointing office shall appoint one member who meets each of the following criteria:

(1) An engineer, architect, or other professional with knowledge and expertise in building construction or design.

(2) An accountant, economist, or other professional with knowledge and expertise in evaluating financial transactions and program cost-effectiveness.

(3) A technical expert in energy efficiency, clean energy, or energy systems and programs.

(c) The California Public Utilities Commission and the California Energy Commission shall each designate an ex officio member to serve on the board.

(d) The board shall do all of the following:

(1) Annually review all expenditures from the Job Creation Fund.

(2) Commission and review an annual independent audit of the Job Creation Fund and of a selection of projects completed to assess the effectiveness of the expenditures in meeting the objectives of this division.

(3) Publish a complete accounting of all expenditures each year, posting
 the information on a publicly accessible Internet Web site.

(4) Submit an evaluation of the program to the Legislature identifying any changes needed to meet the objectives of this division.

(History: Added November 6, 2012, by initiative Proposition 39, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

26211.

Funding for the board shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 55, Sec. 2.   (SB 110)   Effective July 10, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26212.

(a) Members of the board shall serve for a term of four years and may be reappointed for up to two additional terms.

(b) A majority of board members shall constitute a quorum.

(c) The board’s principal office shall be located in the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission’s office in Sacramento.

(d) Each board member shall be entitled to one vote. All votes shall be recorded and reported in the minutes of the board.

(e) The board shall select from among its members a chair and a vice chair, as provided in Section 26214.

(f) Members of the board shall not be compensated for their service, but may be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

(g) Requests for reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses shall be submitted to the chair for approval and may be paid in accordance with Section 26217.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 55, Sec. 3.   (SB 110)   Effective July 10, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26213.

(a) The board shall meet at least four times per year or as often as the chair or the board deems necessary to conduct its business.

(b) The chair shall, with the assistance of staff, prepare the agenda for each board meeting. Meeting agendas shall be prepared in advance of each meeting based on input from board members, staff, and the public.

(c) The board and any committees established by the board shall comply with, and be subject to, the requirements of the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(d) The board shall comply with, and be subject to, the requirements of the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 387.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

26214.

(a) The first meeting of the board, at which a chair shall be selected, may be held upon appointment of all nine members of the board and shall be called jointly by the Treasurer, the Controller, and the Attorney General.

(b) The board shall elect a chair and vice chair at the first meeting of the board each year and each such individual shall hold office for one year commencing on the following July 1 and ending when his or her successor takes office. If there is a vacancy during the year in the office of the chair or vice chair, a majority of the active members of the board shall elect a replacement chair or vice chair to serve the remainder of the year. If the interim vacancy is in the office of the chair, then the vice chair shall perform the duties of the
 chair until a successor is elected.

(c) The board shall establish rules of operation for the board that are consistent with the rules and practices applicable to other state boards.

(d) In the absence of the chair during a meeting, the vice chair shall perform all of the functions of the chair.

(e) The chair shall oversee meetings, serve as an ex officio member of all committees, work in partnership with staff to ensure board resolutions are carried out, call special meetings if necessary, appoint all committee chairs and recommend who will serve on committees, prepare agendas for meetings, coordinate the hiring and evaluations of staff and consultants, act as spokesperson for the board, periodically consult with board members on their roles, and ensure that the rules of procedure and decorum contained in this
 chapter are observed and enforced.

(f) The vice chair shall carry out special assignments as requested by the chair, understand the responsibilities of the chair, and be able to perform the duties of the chair in the chair’s absence.

(g) Board staff activities shall not be duplicative of ongoing efforts by other state agencies, including, but not limited to, the State Department of Education and the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 55, Sec. 5.   (SB 110)   Effective July 10, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26215.

(a) The board may establish committees as it deems necessary and appropriate. The chair may, with board approval, define and limit a committee’s scope and authority, and establish rules of operation for the committees.

(b) Each committee shall meet and shall make recommendations and reports as deemed necessary or appropriate by the chair or the board.

(c) In the absence of the committee chair, the vice chair shall conduct routine business matters and meetings of the committee.

(d) The status, purpose, and authority of a committee shall be determined by the chair and approved by the board at the time the committee is established by the
 board. The board may modify a committee’s status, purpose, or authority at any time.

(e) A committee may act within its delegated authority without further approval of the board. Committees and committee members shall not make or issue policy statements, recommendations, or media releases without prior approval of the board. A committee activity that implies action by the board or is outside the committee’s delegated authority is prohibited without specific board approval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 55, Sec. 6.   (SB 110)   Effective July 10, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26216.

(a) The board shall review and evaluate the progress and status of projects and shall prepare, approve, and distribute annual reports of its activities, findings, and recommendations to the Governor, the Legislature, and the public, to the extent these actions are consistent with subdivision (d) of Section 26210. Each annual report shall concern the activities of the board and its committees during the preceding calendar year and shall be distributed within 90 days of the end of the calendar year to which it pertains.

(b) The process for preparing, approving, and distributing the annual reports shall be as follows:

(1) The chair shall be responsible for preparing a draft annual report that shall be
 presented at a regularly scheduled meeting of the board.

(2) The draft annual report shall be discussed and considered by the board at the meeting and shall be approved as presented or with amendments or changes following the opportunity for, and receipt of, any public comment.

(3) After the meeting, the annual report shall be put into its final approved form and shall be distributed and published on the board’s Internet Web site.

(c) The annual report distributed pursuant to this section shall be submitted to the Legislature in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 55, Sec. 7.   (SB 110)   Effective July 10, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26217.

(a) Expenses of the board shall be accounted for and paid in a manner that is consistent with the State Administrative Manual and any related processes and procedures. The board may delegate to the chair or staff the authority to approve expenses, pay expenses, or both.

(b) Expenditure items exceeding the board’s budget, or expenditure items the chair deems worthy of further consideration, shall be brought before the board for consideration at the next meeting.

(c) The chair shall be responsible for tracking the board’s budget and regularly reporting to the board if expenditures are within the amounts planned and what steps have been taken or are proposed to be taken to ensure that the board has
 sufficient funds to accomplish its annual mission.

(d) The chair may testify before a state authority and his or her actual and necessary travel, meal, and lodging expenses shall be reimbursed.

(e) The expenses of the board shall be published in the board’s annual report required by Section 26216.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 55, Sec. 8.   (SB 110)   Effective July 10, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Definitions [26220. - 26220.]

26220.

The following definitions apply to this division:

(a) “Clean energy” means a device or technology that meets the definition of “renewable energy” in Section 26003, or that contributes to improved energy management or efficiency.

(b) “Board” means the Citizens Oversight Board established in Section 26210.

(c) “Job Creation Fund” means the Clean Energy Job Creation Fund established in Section 26205.

(d) “Program overhead costs” include staffing for state agency development and management of funding programs pursuant to this division, but excluding technical assistance,
 evaluation, measurement, and validation, or costs related to increasing project efficiency or performance, and costs related to local implementation.

(History: Added November 6, 2012, by initiative Proposition 39, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Proposition 39 Implementation [26225. - 26240.]

26225.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Chancellor” means the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(b) “Energy Commission” means the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission.

(c) “Local education agency,” “local educational agency,” or “LEA” means a school district, county office of education, charter school, or state special school.

(d) “Job Creation Fund” means the Clean Energy Job Creation Fund established in Section 26205.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 357, Sec. 53.   (SB 97)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

26227.

(a) (1) For the 2013–14 fiscal year, twenty-eight million dollars ($28,000,000) shall be transferred from the Job Creation Fund to the Education Subaccount, which is hereby created in the State Energy Conservation Assistance Account created pursuant to Section 25416. The moneys in the Education Subaccount are appropriated to the Energy Commission for the purpose of low-interest and no-interest revolving loans and loan loss reserves for eligible projects and technical assistance.

(2) For the 2013–14 fiscal year, funds in the Education Subaccount shall be available for local educational agencies and community college districts. If a local educational agency or community college district has an eligible project, the amount of the funding resources gap that is to be considered a reasonable loan value from the Education Subaccount is the project cost less the amount of any grant awarded pursuant to Section 26233 and less any state, federal, or local incentives. A local educational agency or community college district may need to meet additional credit or other financial qualifying criteria applicable pursuant to the Energy Conservation Assistance Act of 1979 (Chapter 5.2 (commencing with Section 25410) of Division 15). The Energy Commission shall facilitate a local educational agency or community college district’s participation in both the Job Creation Fund and Energy Conservation Assistance Account programs through coordinated information, documentation, and review processes regarding the project and the borrowing entity.

(b) For the 2014–15 through 2017–18 fiscal years, inclusive, the amount transferred from the Job Creation Fund to the Energy Conservation Assistance Account shall be determined in the annual budget.

(c) Funds remaining in the Education Subaccount after the 2017–18 fiscal year shall continue to be available in future years pursuant to Section 26205.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 55, Sec. 9.   (SB 110)   Effective July 10, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26227.2.

(a) Commencing with the 2018–19 fiscal year, the Clean Energy Job Creation Program is hereby established for the purpose of funding projects described in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 26205 that create jobs in California improving energy efficiency and expanding clean energy generation.

(b) All of the following criteria shall apply to the Clean Energy Job Creation Program:

(1) Project selection and oversight shall be managed by, and funds shall be appropriated only to, existing state and local government agencies with established expertise in managing energy projects and programs.

(2) All projects shall be selected
 based on in-state job creation and energy benefits for each project type.

(3) All projects shall be cost effective with the total benefits being greater than the costs of the project over time. Project selection may, in addition to energy benefits, include consideration of nonenergy benefits, such as health and safety.

(4) All projects shall require contracts that identify the project specifications, costs, and projected energy savings.

(5) All projects shall be subject to audit.

(6) Program overhead costs, including administrative costs incurred by the Energy Commission, shall not exceed 4 percent of the total funding.

(7) Agencies administering the program shall coordinate with the
 Energy Commission and the Public Utilities Commission to avoid duplication and to maximize leverage of existing energy efficiency and clean energy efforts.

(8) Eligible expenditures include expenditures associated with technical assistance and with reducing project costs and delays, including the development and implementation of processes that reduce the costs of design, permitting or financing, or other barriers to project completion and job creation.

(c) Commencing with the 2018–19 fiscal year, funds appropriated in the annual Budget Act or another statute for the Clean Energy Job Creation Program shall be available as follows:

(1) Eleven percent of the funds shall be available to community college districts, to be allocated by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges at his or her discretion for
 program purposes.

(2) (A) The remaining moneys shall be allocated to local educational agencies as follows:

(i) Ten percent shall be for local educational agencies with an average daily attendance of not more than 1,000.

(ii) Ten percent shall be for local educational agencies with an average daily attendance of more than 1,000 and not more than 2,000.

(iii) Eighty percent shall be for local educational agencies with an average daily attendance of more than 2,000.

(B) The Energy Commission may adjust the funding allocations specified in subparagraph (A) and may add additional categories based on average daily attendance to further the purposes of this section.

(C) The Energy Commission in allocating grants to local educational agencies pursuant to this section shall give priority based on the following:

(i) The local educational agency’s percentage of students eligible for free or reduced-price meals in the prior year.

(ii) Geographic diversity that ensures urban, suburban, and rural local educational agencies receive grants and ensures the awarding of grant funding in all regions of the state.

(iii) Workforce needs of the areas in which the local educational agencies are located, as determined by the California Workforce Investment Board and the local workforce investment boards.

(d) A local educational agency that receives moneys pursuant to this
 section shall encumber those moneys within nine months of allocation.

(e) For purposes of this section, a “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, charter school, or state special school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 250, Sec. 18.   (AB 129)   Effective September 16, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26230.

(a) The sum of three million dollars ($3,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the Job Creation Fund to the California Workforce Investment Board to develop and implement a competitive grant program for eligible community-based and other training workforce organizations preparing disadvantaged youth or veterans for employment.

(b) In developing and implementing the program, the board shall do all of the following:

(1) In consultation with the Energy Commission and the Public Utilities Commission, develop a competitive process to award grants to eligible entities and evaluate and select applications for grants.

(2) Administer grants to eligible entities for the purposes of work experience and job training on energy efficiency and clean energy projects.

(c) In awarding the grants, the California Workforce Investment Board shall give priority to projects that include the following elements:

(1) Specific skills gained through hands-on application related to energy efficiency and clean energy that is embedded in, or linked to, a broader occupational training program.

(2) Actual work experience gained through hands-on clean energy project implementation.

(3) Industry-recognized credentials and certificates.

(4) Training that demonstrates a
 high probability of placement of trainees into career track jobs.

(5) A partnership with state-approved apprenticeship programs that promote industry-recognized skills and credentials through work experience and lead to placement in a state-approved apprenticeship programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 29, Sec. 2.   (SB 73)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

26233.

(a) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year and through the 2017–18 fiscal year, inclusive, the funds deposited annually in the Job Creation Fund and remaining after the transfer pursuant to Section 26227 and the appropriation pursuant to Section 26230 shall be allocated, to the extent consistent with this division, as follows:

(1) Eighty-nine percent of the funds shall be available to local educational agencies and allocated by the Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) Eleven percent of the funds shall be available to community college districts and allocated by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges at his or her discretion.

(b) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allocate the funds provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) as follows:

(1) Eighty-five percent on the basis of average daily attendance reported as of the second principal apportionment for the prior fiscal year. For purposes of this section, average daily attendance for the state special schools shall be deemed to be 97 percent of the prior year enrollment as reported in the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System.

(A) For every local educational agency with average daily attendance as reported pursuant to this subdivision of 100 or less, the amount awarded shall be fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).

(B) For every local educational agency with average daily attendance as reported
 pursuant to this subdivision in excess of 100, but 1,000 or less, the amount awarded shall be either that local educational agency’s proportional award on the basis of average daily attendance or fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), whichever amount is larger.

(C) For every local educational agency with average daily attendance as reported pursuant to this subdivision in excess of 1,000, but less than 2,000, the amount awarded shall be either that local educational agency’s proportional award on the basis of average daily attendance or one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), whichever amount is larger.

(D) For every local educational agency with average daily attendance as reported pursuant to this subdivision of 2,000 or more, the amount awarded shall be the local educational agency’s proportional award on the basis of average daily attendance.

(2) Fifteen percent on the basis of students eligible for free and reduced-price meals in the prior year.

(3) For every local educational agency that receives over one million dollars ($1,000,000) pursuant to this subdivision, not less than 50 percent of the funds shall be used for projects larger than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) that achieve substantial energy efficiency, clean energy, and jobs benefits.

(c) A local educational agency subject to subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) may submit a written request to the Superintendent of Public Instruction, by September 1 of each year, to receive in the current year its funding allocation for both the current year and the following year, both of which would be based on the average daily attendance used in the current year for
 determining funding pursuant to the applicable subparagraph. A local educational agency requesting funding pursuant to this subdivision shall not receive a funding allocation in the year following the request. This election applies to the funding available pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b).

(d) A local educational agency shall encumber funds received pursuant to this section by June 30, 2019.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 55, Sec. 11.   (SB 110)   Effective July 10, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26235.

(a) The Energy Commission, in consultation with the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, and the Public Utilities Commission, shall establish guidelines for the following:

(1) Standard methods for estimating energy benefits, including reasonable assumptions for current and future costs of energy, and guidelines to compute the cost of energy saved as a result of implementing eligible projects funded by this chapter.

(2) Contractor qualifications, licensing, and certifications appropriate for the work to be performed, provided that the Energy Commission shall not create any new qualification, license, or certification pursuant to this
 subparagraph.

(3) Project evaluation, including the following:

(A) Benchmarks or energy rating systems to select best candidate facilities.

(B) Use of energy surveys or audits to inform project opportunities, costs, and savings.

(C) Sequencing of facility improvements.

(D) Methodologies for cost-effectiveness determination.

(4) To ensure that adequate energy audit, measurement, and verification procedures are employed to ensure that energy savings and greenhouse gas emissions reductions occur as a result of any funding provided pursuant to this section. The Energy Commission shall develop a simple preinstallation verification
 form that includes project description, estimated energy savings, expected number of jobs created, current energy usage, and costs. The Energy Commission may develop benchmarking and other innovative facility evaluation systems in coordination with the University of California.

(5) Achievement of the maximum feasible energy efficiency or clean energy benefits, as well as job creation benefits for Californians, resulting from projects implemented pursuant to this chapter.

(6) Where applicable, ensuring LEAs assist classified school employees with training and information to better understand how they can support and maximize the achievement of energy savings envisioned by the funded project.

(b) The Energy Commission shall allow the use of data analytics of energy usage data, where possible, in the energy auditing,
 evaluation, inventorying, measuring, and verification of projects. To ensure quality of results, data analytics providers shall have received prior technical validation by the Energy Commission, a local utility, or the Public Utilities Commission.

(c) A community college district or LEA shall not use a sole source process to award funds pursuant to this chapter. A community college district or LEA may use the best value criteria as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 20133 of the Public Contract Code to award funds pursuant to this chapter.

(d) The Energy Commission shall adopt the guidelines in accordance with this section at a publicly noticed meeting and provide an opportunity for public comment. The Energy Commission shall provide written public notice of a meeting at least 30 days prior to the meeting.

(1) For substantive revision of the guidelines, the Energy Commission shall provide written notice of a meeting at least 15 days prior to the meeting at which the revision is to be considered or adopted.

(2) The adoption or revision of guidelines pursuant to this division is exempt from Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(e) Each participating LEA shall prioritize the eligible projects within its jurisdiction taking into consideration, as applicable, at least the following factors:

(1) The age of the school facilities, as well as any plans to close or demolish the facilities.

(2) The proportion of pupils eligible for funds under Title I of the federal No Child Left Behind
 Act of 2001 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.) at particular schoolsites.

(3) Whether the facilities have been recently modernized.

(4) The facilities’ hours of operation, including whether the facilities are operated on a year-round basis.

(5) The school’s energy intensity as determined from an energy rating or benchmark system such as the United States Environmental Protection Agency’s Energy Star system or other acceptable benchmarking approach that may be available from local utilities, the American Society for Heating, Refrigerating, and Air-Conditioning Engineers, Inc., or reputable building analysis software as is appropriate to the size, budget, and expertise available to the school.

(6) The estimated financial return of each project’s investment
 over the expected lifecycle of the project, in terms of net present value and return on investment.

(7) Each project’s potential for energy demand reduction.

(8) The anticipated health and safety improvements or other nonenergy benefits for each project.

(9) The individual or collective project’s ability to facilitate matriculation of local residents into state-certified apprenticeship programs.
